Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.194.030

Duties and authority of education provider.

(1) Except as otherwise provided for by contract under RCW 28A.194.060, the duties and authority of a school district, educational service district, institution of higher education, or private contractor to provide for education programs under this chapter include:

(a) Employing, supervising, and controlling administrators, teachers, specialized personnel, and other persons necessary to conduct education programs, subject to security clearance by the adult jail facilities;

(b) Purchasing, leasing, renting, or providing textbooks, maps, audiovisual equipment paper, writing instruments, physical education equipment, and other instructional equipment, materials, and supplies deemed necessary by the provider of the education programs;

(c) Conducting education programs for inmates under the age of eighteen in accordance with program standards established by the superintendent of public instruction;

(d) Expending funds for the direct and indirect costs of maintaining and operating the program of education that are appropriated by the legislature and allocated by the superintendent of public instruction for the exclusive purpose of maintaining and operating education programs for juvenile inmates incarcerated in adult jail facilities, in addition to funds from federal and private grants, and bequests, and gifts made for the purpose of maintaining and operating the program of education; and

(e) Providing educational services to juvenile inmates within five school days of receiving notification from an adult jail facility within the district's boundaries that an individual under the age of eighteen has been incarcerated.

(2) The school district, educational service district, institution of higher education, or private contractor shall develop the curricula, instruction methods, and educational objectives of the education programs, subject to applicable requirements of state and federal law. For inmates who are under the age of eighteen when they commence the program and who have not met high school graduation requirements, such courses of instruction and school-related student activities as are provided by the school district for students outside of adult jail facilities shall be provided by the school district for students in adult jail facilities, to the extent that it is practical and judged appropriate by the school district and the administrator of the adult jail facility.

[ 2010 c 226 s 4.]